Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.801

Sexual assault forensic examination best practices advisory group. (Expires July 1, 2026.)

(1)(a) The sexual assault forensic examination best practices advisory group is established within the office of the attorney general for the purpose of reviewing best practice models for managing all aspects of sexual assault investigations and for reducing the number of untested sexual assault kits in Washington state.

(i) The caucus leaders from the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate.

(ii) The caucus leaders from the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives.

(iii) The attorney general, in consultation with the legislative members of the advisory group, shall appoint:

(A) One member representing each of the following:

(I) The Washington state patrol;

(II) The Washington association of sheriffs and police chiefs;

(III) The Washington association of prosecuting attorneys;

(IV) The Washington defender association or the Washington association of criminal defense lawyers;

(V) The Washington association of cities;

(VI) The Washington association of county officials;

(VII) The Washington coalition of sexual assault programs;

(VIII) The office of crime victims advocacy;

(IX) The Washington state hospital association;

(X) The office of the attorney general; and

(XI) The criminal justice training commission;

(B) Two members representing survivors of sexual assault;

(C) One member who is a sexual assault nurse examiner;

(D) Two members who are law enforcement officers, one from a rural area and one from an urban area of the state;

(E) One member who is a prosecuting attorney serving in a county in a rural area of the state; and

(F) Two members who are community-based advocates, one from a rural area and one from an urban area of the state.

(b) When appointing members under (a)(iii)(D) of this subsection, the office of the attorney general shall solicit recommendations from statewide labor organizations representing law enforcement officers.

(2) The duties of the advisory group include, but are not limited to:

(a) Researching the best practice models both in state and from other states for collaborative responses to victims of sexual assault from the point the sexual assault kit is collected to the conclusion of the investigation and prosecution of a case, and providing recommendations regarding any existing gaps in Washington and resources that may be necessary to address those gaps;

(b) Researching and making recommendations on opportunities to increase access to, and availability of, critical sexual assault nurse examiner services;

(c) Monitoring the testing of the backlog of sexual assault kits and the supply chain and distribution of sexual assault kits;

(d) Monitoring implementation of state and federal legislative changes;

(e) Collaborating with the legislature, state agencies, medical facilities, and local governments to implement reforms pursuant to federal grant requirements; and

(f) Making recommendations for institutional reforms necessary to prevent sexual assault and improve the experiences of sexual assault survivors in the criminal justice system.

(3) The office of the attorney general shall administer and provide staff support to the advisory group.

(4) Legislative members of the advisory group must be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 44.04.120. Nonlegislative members, except those representing an employer or organization, are entitled to be reimbursed for travel expenses in accordance with RCW 43.03.050 and 43.03.060.

(5) The advisory group must meet no less than twice annually.

(6) The advisory group shall report its findings and recommendations to the appropriate committees of the legislature and the governor by December 15th of each year.

(7) This section expires July 1, 2026.

[ 2023 c 197 s 1.]